Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.070

Accounts of minors and incompetents.

A minor or incompetent may enter into a valid and enforceable contract of deposit with the financial institution and any account in the name of a minor or incompetent shall, in the absence of clear and convincing evidence of a different intention at the time it is created, be held for the exclusive right and benefit of the minor or incompetent free from the control of all other persons.

[ 1981 c 192 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.22.070.]